Florida, session 2026, SB196.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 13 381.9312, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 14 381.9312âUterine fibroid research database; education and 15 public awareness.â 16 (2)âUTERINE FIBROID RESEARCH DATABASE.â 17 (c)âThe department shall include uterine fibroids in the 18 list of diseases issued under s. 381.0031(4) The database may 19 not include any personal identifying information of women 20 diagnosed with or treated for uterine fibroids. 21 22 The information required to be included under this subsection is 23 subject to s. 381.0031. 24 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.